District of Columbia statutes.
34-1731.08

Delegation of authority.

The Mayor may delegate the powers established by this chapter to OCTO. In exercising this authority, OCTO may consult with such other agencies as it considers appropriate in the best interests of the District.

History

Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-210, § 9, 53 DCR 9122

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 9 of Digital Inclusion Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-467, July 25, 2006, 53 DCR 6754).